Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1)(a) The Department of Consumer and Business  Services shall assist and
provide staff support to the  Oregon Building Officials Association for the purpose of devel-
oping and submitting to the State Apprenticeship and Training Council a proposal to estab-
lish an apprenticeship program for building inspectors that meets the  requirements set forth
in ORS 660.002 to 660.210 and qualifies  as the practical experience equivalent of the training
and experience standards described in ORS 455.720 (1)(a).
(b) At the  association’s request, the Bureau of Labor and Industries shall provide tech-
nical assistance for the development and submission of the proposal described in paragraph
(a) of this subsection.
(2) After the council approves the proposal described in subsection (1)  of this section, the
department shall within 90 days after the date of the council’s  approval establish and provide
technical assistance to a state joint apprenticeship committee for building inspectors.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 455.720 is amended to read:
455.720. (1) In accordance with applicable provisions of ORS chapter  183, to promote effective
and uniform enforcement of the  state building code by improving the competence of building officials
and inspectors, the Director of the Department of Consumer and  Business Services, with the advice
of the advisory boards, shall:
(a) Establish for building officials and inspectors reasonable minimum training and experience
standards, including but not limited to courses or  subjects for instruction, facilities for instruction,
qualification of instructors and methods of instruction. The  standards [ shall] must  include pro-
visions for determining a practical  experience equivalent  that may consist of completion of an
apprenticeship program.
(b) Establish a procedure  to be used by municipalities to determine whether a person meets
minimum standards or has minimum training to  be appointed or employed as a building official or
inspector. The procedure [ shall] must  allow for a field examination of a  person to determine if the
person meets the practical experience equivalent of a minimum standard.
(c) Subject to such terms, conditions and classifications as the director may  impose, certify
building officials as being qualified, and revoke such certifications in the manner  provided in ORS
455.740.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1086 (SB 1086-A) Page 1
(d) Require an applicant for  a certificate as a building official or inspector to demonstrate
knowledge of the laws governing accessibility to buildings by persons  with disabilities by passing
an examination prescribed by the director.
(2) The director shall maintain and, upon request of municipalities, furnish information on  ap-
plicants for appointment or employment as building officials or inspectors.
(3) Pursuant to ORS chapter 183, the director shall adopt rules  necessary to carry out the cer-
tification programs provided by subsection (1) of this section.
(4) The director, by rule, may require evidence of completion of continuing education covering
any certification created  under this section as a condition of maintaining the certification. Nothing
in this subsection shall prohibit the director from delegating any of this power to a municipality.
(5) The director, with the advice  of the appropriate advisory boards, may adopt rules for certi-
fying inspectors as being qualified to enforce one or more  particular specialty codes, subject to any
terms, conditions and classifications the director may impose, and for revoking those  certifications
in the manner provided in ORS 455.740.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by Senate April 10, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 20, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1086 (SB 1086-A) Page 2